Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-142
Incentives authorized.

A telecommunications company may offer special incentives, discounts, packaged offerings, temporary price waivers, or other promotions and may introduce new telecommunications service and discontinue existing telecommunications service by filing rate lists which shall be effective after ten days' notice to the commission.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 41.